Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB25.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 671(b)(2) and 672(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 671. Fiscal Year.--* * *(b) * * *(2) A school district that delays the adoption of its annual budget under paragraph (1) shall adopt an annual budget no later than [fifteen] thirty days subsequent to the enactment of legislation providing the appropriation for basic education funding to be paid as a reimbursement for the preceding year.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 Section 672. Tax Levy; Limitations.--(a) In all school districts of the second, third, and fourth class, all school taxes shall be levied and assessed by the board of school directors therein, during the month of February or March or April or May or June each year, or no later than [twenty] thirty-five days following the enactment of legislation providing the appropriation for basic education funding to be paid as a reimbursement for the preceding school year, for the ensuing fiscal year, except in districts of the second class where the fiscal year begins on the first day of January, in which the school taxes shall be levied and assessed during the month of October or November of each year. In such school districts the tax rate shall not exceed twenty-five mills on the dollar, on the total amount of the assessed valuation of all property taxable for school purposes therein. Each school district of the second, third or fourth class may also collect a per capita tax on each resident or inhabitant of such district over eighteen years of age, as herein provided.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0025PN0006 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920